Maine, session 132, LD1600.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §911 is enacted to read:
§911. Special response teams
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.
B. "Fund" means the Special Response Team Fund established in subsection 3.
C. "Special response team” means an elite tactical group of law enforcement officers
certified by the Maine Criminal Justice Academy that rapidly responds to high-risk law
enforcement operations and conducts criminal investigations that exceed the
capabilities of standard law enforcement agencies and require specialized training,
equipment and tactics.
2. County contribution to Special Response Team Fund. By March 1st of each year,
a county shall contribute funds to the fund in an amount calculated in subsection 4.
3. Special Response Team Fund. The Special Response Team Fund is established
within the department as a revolving, nonlapsing fund administered by the department to
fund special response teams. The fund is funded by county contributions under this section,
appropriations, allocations and grants and donations from other public and private sources.
The department shall make a disbursement from the fund in an amount determined under
subsection 5 to a municipality that maintains and operates a special response team.
4. Contribution calculation. By February 1st of each year, the department shall collect
an accounting from a municipality maintaining a special response team of the previous
calendar year's expenses of the municipality to maintain and operate the special response
team to determine a county's contribution required under subsection 2. If 2 or more
municipalities collaborate to maintain and operate a single special response team, the
department shall collect an accounting from each municipality in the collaboration of that
municipality's expenses in maintaining and operating the special response team for the
previous calendar year. The department shall determine each county's annual contribution
to the fund in an amount equal to a pro rata share based upon the county's population
compared to the statewide population of the amount required to reimburse 10% of the total
statewide municipal expenses to maintain and operate special response teams. The
department shall provide each county with an accounting of the amount due for that county
under this subsection and deposit funds collected under subsection 2 into the fund.
5. Disbursements from the fund. By April 1st of each year, the department shall make
a disbursement from the fund to a municipality maintaining a special response team in an
amount equal to 10% of the previous calendar year's expenses of the municipality to
maintain and operate a special response team submitted to the department under subsection
4. If 2 or more municipalities collaborate to maintain and operate a single special response
team, the department shall reimburse each municipality an amount equal to 10% of the
respective municipality's previous calendar year's expenses in maintaining and operating
the special response team submitted to the department under subsection 4. If there are not
enough funds in the fund to fully make the disbursements required under this subsection,
the department shall disburse an amount to each municipality due a disbursement from the
Page 1 - 132LR0787(01)

414 fund a proportionate share of that municipality's previous calendar year's expenses based
425 upon the amount available in the fund to make disbursements.
6. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.